Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1318.01
Payment with respect to support order obligor authorized.

The State Treasurer may make payment on a claim filed under the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act by a person who is not the owner of the property, or by a legal representative of such person, when the owner is an obligor, as defined in section 43-3341, and the person filing the claim is an obligee, as defined in such section. Such payments shall only be made to credit an arrearage of an obligor.

Laws 2006, LB 771, § 1.